District of Columbia statutes.
38-2802

Personnel files.

The District of Columbia Public Schools (“DCPS”) shall, by December 31, 1998, contract with a firm experienced in human resource management to comprehensively rebuild all DCPS employee personnel files.

Mar. 26, 1999, D.C. Law 12-175, § 1103, 45 DCR 7193

History

1981 Ed., § 31-152.

Prior Codifications

For temporary addition of subchapter see notes to § 38-2801.
For temporary (90-day) addition of Chapter 1B 1981 Ed., see notes following § 38-2801.

Emergency Legislation